Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202566-301
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 66-301 to 66-304:

(1) Covered electric generating unit means a fossil fuel-fired electric generating unit existing within the state prior to August 30, 2015, that is subject to regulation under the federal emission guidelines;

(2) Federal emission guidelines means any final rules, regulations, guidelines, or other requirements that the United States Environmental Protection Agency may adopt for regulating carbon dioxide emissions from covered electric generating units under section 111(d) of the federal Clean Air Act, 42 U.S.C. 7411(d);

(3) State means the State of Nebraska; and

(4) State plan means any plan to establish and enforce carbon dioxide emission control measures that the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment may adopt to implement the obligations of the state under the federal emission guidelines.

Laws 2015, LB469, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 71;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 356.